Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
ESTABLISHMENT OF COMMISSION

§351-11 Crime victim compensation
commission. There shall be a crime victim compensation commission composed
of three members appointed and removable in the manner prescribed by section
26-34. No officer or employee of the State or any county shall be eligible for
appointment to the commission. The commission is placed within the department
of public safety for administrative purposes. [L 1967, c 226, pt of §1; HRS
§351-11; am L 1970, c 105, §5; am L 1987, c 338, §10; am L 1989, c 177, §4 and
c 211, §8; am L 1992, c 260, §1; am L 1998, c 240, §4]

Case Notes

Action against commission for damages. 59 H. 404, 581 P.2d
766 (1978).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next